Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
291

TRAFFIC
VIOLATIONS

Part I. Operation

Section

291-1 Definitions

291-2 Reckless driving of vehicle or riding of
animals;

penalty

291-3 Repealed

291-3.1 Consuming or possessing intoxicating
liquor while

operating motor vehicle or moped

291-3.2 Consuming or possessing intoxicating
liquor while a

passenger in a motor vehicle

291-3.3 Storage of opened container containing
intoxicating

liquor or consumption at scenic lookout

291-3.4 Exceptions; consumption or possession of
intoxicating

liquor while a passenger in a motor
vehicle, storage

of opened container containing
intoxicating liquor

291-4 to 4.5 Repealed

291-4.6 Driving after license suspended or denied for

noncompliance with an order of support;
penalties

291-5 to 7 Repealed

291-8 Freight on motor cars; projection of,
prohibited

291-9 Freight; on running board

291-10 Penalty

291-11 Riders and passengers under seven years of
age on

motorcycles and motor scooters prohibited;
penalty

291-11.5 Child passenger restraints

291-11.6 Mandatory use of seat belts, when, penalty

291-12 Inattention to driving

291-13 Traffic laws apply to persons driving
mopeds

291-14 Pickup trucks; passenger restrictions

291-15 Trauma system surcharge

291-16 Safe routes to school program surcharge

291-17 Mobile electronic devices; use while
operating a

commercial motor vehicle prohibited

Part II. Equipment

291-21 Repealed

291-21.3 Definitions

291-21.5 Regulation of motor vehicle sun screening
devices;

penalty

291-22 Regulation of exhaust pipe and muffler

291-23 Penalty

291-24 Motorcycles and mopeds, noisy mufflers;
penalty

291-24.5 Motor vehicle muffler

291-24.6 Motor vehicle alarm systems

291-25 Lights for motor vehicles, motorcycles,
motor

scooters, motorized bicycles

291-26 Testing lights

291-27 Repealed

291-28 Lights for loads

291-29 Lights for other vehicles

291-30 Spotlights

291-31 Tail lights on vehicles, motorcycles and
motor

scooters

291-31.5 Blue lights prohibited for motor vehicles,
motorcycles,

motor scooters, bicycles, mopeds

291-32 Penalties

291-33 Projections on face of wheels prohibited

291-34 Size of vehicles; width, height, and
length

291-35 Gross weight, axle, and wheel loads

291-35.1 Regulation of bumper heights

291-36 Exceptions

291-37 Penalties

291-38 Repealed

291-39 Enforcement

Part III. Parking for Disabled Persons

291-51 Definitions

291-51.3 Reimbursement to counties; agreement with
counties

to provide permits

291-51.4
Fraudulent verification of an applicant as a person

with a
disability; penalty

291-51.5 Special license plates

291-51.6 Issuance of temporary removable windshield
placards

291-52 Issuance of removable windshield placard

291-52.5 Issuance of identification card

291-52.6 Replacement of a removable windshield
placard or

identification card

291-54
Display of removable and temporary removable

windshield
placards

291-56 Rules

Part IV. Miscellaneous

291-71 Designation of parking spaces for electric
vehicles;

charging system

291-72 Parking spaces reserved for electric
vehicles;

penalties

Note

For electric vehicle registration, parking, HOV lane use, and
rules (repealed June 30, 2020) as provided by L 2012, c 168, §2, see note
following §291-71.

Cross References

Adjudication of traffic infractions, see chapter 291D.

Nonresident violator compact, see chapter 291A.

Law Journals and Reviews

Intextication: Txting Whl Drvng. Does the Punishment Fit
the Crime? 32 UH L. Rev. 359 (2010).

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next